Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.2. Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.

§ 36-55.24.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.”

History.

1972, c. 830.

The numbers of §§

36-55.24

through

36-55.52

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1972 act having assigned no numbers.

Law Review.

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

§ 36-55.25.
Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared: (i) that there exists within the Commonwealth a serious shortage of sanitary and safe residential housing at prices or rentals which persons and families of low and moderate income can afford; that this shortage has contributed to and will contribute to the creation and persistence of substandard living conditions and is inimical to the health, welfare and prosperity of the residents of the Commonwealth; (ii) that it is imperative that the supply of residential housing for such persons and families and for persons and families displaced by public actions or natural disaster be increased; (iii) that private enterprise and investment have been unable, without assistance, to produce the needed construction or rehabilitation of sanitary and safe residential housing at prices or rentals which persons and families of low and moderate income can afford and to provide sufficient long-term mortgage financing for residential housing for occupancy by such persons and families; (iv) that a concentration of persons and families of low and moderate income even in standard structures does not eliminate undesirable social conditions; (v) that the governing body of a city or county may in its discretion determine that it is necessary to the preservation of the financial viability of such city or county and the health, welfare and prosperity of its residents that the population of such city or county be maintained as economically mixed by providing housing for persons and families of other than low and moderate income in order to broaden the tax bases of such areas; (vi) that in providing sanitary and safe residential housing at prices or rentals which persons and families of low and moderate income can afford it may at times be necessary or desirable to provide housing for persons and families of other than low and moderate income; (vii) that it is critical to the success, prosperity and viability of areas being revitalized that financing be made available for nonhousing buildings that are incidental to residential housing for low and moderate income persons and families and other persons and families in order to provide products and services to those living in residential housing or that are necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such areas or for the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such areas; (viii) that the financing of residential housing for low and moderate income persons and families and other persons and families may be appropriate to promote the industrial, commercial or other economic development of certain areas in a city or the county by inducing manufacturing, industrial, commercial, governmental, educational, entertainment, community development, healthcare or nonprofit enterprises or undertakings to locate or remain in such area; and (ix) that private enterprise and investment be encouraged both to sponsor land development and build and rehabilitate residential housing for such persons and families of low and moderate income and to build housing which will prevent the recurrence of slum conditions by housing persons of varied economic means in the same projects or area, and that private financing be supplemented by financing as provided in this chapter in order to help prevent the creation and recurrence of substandard living conditions and to assist in their permanent elimination throughout Virginia.

It is further declared that in order to provide a fully adequate supply of sanitary and safe dwelling accommodations at rents, prices, or other costs which such persons or families can afford and to stabilize or recover an appropriate economic mix in certain areas of the Commonwealth the legislature finds that it is necessary to create and establish a state housing development authority for the purpose of encouraging the investment of private capital and stimulating the construction and rehabilitation of residential housing to meet the needs of such persons and families or to stabilize such areas through the use of public financing, to provide construction and mortgage loans and to make provision for the purchase of mortgage loans and otherwise.

It is hereby further declared to be necessary and in the public interest that such state housing development authority provide for predevelopment costs, temporary financing, land development expenses and residential housing construction or rehabilitation by private sponsors for sale or rental to persons and families of low and moderate income and others; further, to provide mortgage financing for the purposes of supplying sanitary and safe dwelling accommodations at rents, prices or other costs which such persons or families can afford or of stabilizing urban areas, including without limitation, long-term federally insured mortgages; further, in revitalization areas designated in or pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

, to provide financing for nonhousing buildings that are incidental to residential housing financed or to be financed in such areas pursuant to this chapter for low and moderate income persons and families and for other persons and families or that are necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such areas or the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such areas; further, to increase the construction and rehabilitation of low and moderate income housing through the purchase from mortgage lenders authorized to make loans in the Commonwealth of mortgage loans for residential housing for persons and families of low and moderate income in the Commonwealth; further, to acquire, develop and own multifamily residential housing for occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income; further, to provide technical, consultative and project assistance services to private sponsors; further, to assist in coordinating federal, state, regional and local public and private efforts and resources; to guarantee to the extent provided herein the repayment of certain loans secured by residential mortgages; further, to promote wise usage of land and other resources in order to preserve the quality of life we value so highly in Virginia; and further, to act as the loan servicer for a housing lender.

It is hereby further declared that all of the foregoing are public purposes and uses for which public moneys may be borrowed, expended, advanced, loaned, or granted, and that such activities serve a public purpose in improving or otherwise benefiting the people of the Commonwealth; that the necessity of enacting the provisions hereinafter set forth is in the public interest and is hereby so declared as a matter of express legislative determination.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1978, c. 508; 1979, c. 374; 1987, c. 254; 2004, c. 187; 2011, c. 690.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187, in the first paragraph, inserted “county” in three places in clause (v), inserted clauses (vii) and (viii), and redesignated former clause (vii) as clause (ix); in the second paragraph, substituted “an appropriate” for “necessary” and “certain” for “urban” and inserted “of the Commonwealth”; and in the third paragraph, inserted the language “further, in revitalization areas . . . development of such areas” and substituted “multifamily” for “multi-family.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 690 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; and in the third paragraph, added “and further, to act as the loan servicer for a housing lender” at the end and made a related change.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

§ 36-55.26.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Bonds,” “notes,” “bond anticipation notes,”
and

“other obligations”

mean any bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates, or other evidences of financial indebtedness issued by HDA pursuant to this chapter.

“City”
means any city or town in the Commonwealth.

“County”
means any county in the Commonwealth.

“Earned surplus”
shall have the same meaning as in generally accepted accounting standards.

“Economically mixed project”
means residential housing or housing development, which may consist of one or more buildings located on contiguous or noncontiguous parcels that the HDA determines to finance as a single economically mixed project, to be occupied by persons and families of low and moderate income and by other persons and families as the HDA shall determine.

“Federal government”
means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Federal mortgage”
means a mortgage loan for land development for residential housing or residential housing made by the United States or an instrumentality thereof or for which there is a commitment by the United States of America or an instrumentality thereof to make such a mortgage loan.

“Federally insured mortgage”
means a mortgage loan for land development for residential housing or residential housing insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof, or a commitment by the United States or an instrumentality thereof to insure such a mortgage.

“HDA”
means the Virginia Housing Development Authority created and established pursuant to §

36-55.27

.

“Housing development costs”
means the sum total of all costs incurred in the development of a housing development, which are approved by the HDA as reasonable and necessary, which costs shall include, but are not necessarily limited to: fair value of land owned by the sponsor, or cost of land acquisition and any buildings thereon, including payments for options, deposits, or contracts to purchase properties on the proposed housing site or payments for the purchase of such properties; cost of site preparation, demolition and development; architecture, engineering, legal, accounting, HDA, and other fees paid or payable in connection with the planning, execution and financing of the housing development; cost of necessary studies, surveys, plans and permits; insurance, interest; financing, tax and assessment costs and other operating and carrying costs during construction; cost of construction, rehabilitation, reconstruction, fixtures, furnishings, equipment, machinery and apparatus related to the real property; cost of land improvements, including without limitation, landscaping and off-site improvements, whether or not such costs have been paid in cash or in a form other than cash; necessary expenses in connection with initial occupancy of the housing development; a reasonable profit and risk fee in addition to job overhead to the general contractor and, if applicable, a limited profit housing sponsor; an allowance established by HDA for working capital and contingency reserves, and reserves for any anticipated operating deficits during the first two years of occupancy; in the case of an economically mixed project within a revitalization area designated in or pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

, the costs of any nonhousing buildings that are financed in conjunction with such project and that are incidental to such project or are determined by such governing body to be necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such area or for the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such area; the cost of such other items, including tenant relocation, if such tenant relocation costs are not otherwise being provided for, as HDA shall determine to be reasonable and necessary for the development of the housing development, less any and all net rents and other net revenues received from the operation of the real and personal property on the development site during construction.

“Housing development”
or

“housing project”

means any work or undertaking, whether new construction or rehabilitation, which is designed and financed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the primary purpose of providing sanitary, decent, and safe dwelling accommodations for persons and families of low or moderate income in need of housing and, in the case of an economically mixed project, other persons and families; such undertaking may include any buildings, land, equipment, facilities, or other real or personal properties which are necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, such as but not limited to streets, sewers, utilities, parks, site preparation, landscaping, and such offices, and other nonhousing facilities incidental or related to such development or project such as administrative, community, health, nursing care, medical, educational and recreational facilities as HDA determines to be necessary, convenient, or desirable. For the purposes of this chapter, medical and related facilities for the residence and care of the aged shall be deemed to be dwelling accommodations.

“Housing lender”
means any bank or trust company, mortgage banker approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association, savings bank, national banking association, savings and loan association or building and loan association, mortgage broker, mortgage company, mortgage lender, life insurance company, credit union, agency or authority of the Commonwealth or any other state, or locality authorized to finance housing loans on properties located in or outside of the Commonwealth to persons and families of any income.

“Housing sponsor”
means individuals, joint ventures, partnerships, limited partnerships, public bodies, trusts, firms, associations, or other legal entities or any combination thereof, corporations, cooperatives and condominiums, approved by HDA as qualified either to own, construct, acquire, rehabilitate, operate, manage or maintain a housing development whether nonprofit or organized for limited profit subject to the regulatory powers of HDA and other terms and conditions set forth in this chapter.

“Land development”
means the process of acquiring land for residential housing construction, and of making, installing, or constructing nonresidential housing improvements, including, without limitation, waterlines and water supply installations, sewer lines and sewage disposal and treatment installations, steam, gas and electric lines and installations, roads, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm drainage facilities, other related pollution control facilities, and other installations or works, whether on or off the site, which HDA deems necessary or desirable to prepare such land primarily for residential housing construction within the Commonwealth.

“Loan servicer”
means any person who, on behalf of a housing lender, collects or receives payments, including payments of principal, interest, escrow amounts, and other amounts due, on obligations due and owing to the housing lender pursuant to a residential mortgage loan or who, when the borrower is in default or in foreseeable likelihood of default, works on behalf of the housing lender with the borrower to modify or refinance, either temporarily or permanently, the obligations in order to avoid foreclosure or otherwise to finalize collection through the foreclosure process.

“Mortgage”
means a mortgage deed, deed of trust, or other security instrument which shall constitute a lien in the Commonwealth on improvements and real property in fee simple, on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term, which at the time such mortgage is acquired does not expire for at least that number of years beyond the maturity date of the interest-bearing obligation secured by such mortgage as is equal to the number of years remaining until the maturity date of such obligation or on personal property, contract rights or other assets.

“Mortgage lender”
means any bank or trust company, mortgage banker approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association, savings bank, national banking association, savings and loan association, or building and loan association, life insurance company, the federal government or other financial institutions or government agencies which are authorized to and customarily provide service or otherwise aid in the financing of mortgages on residential housing located in the Commonwealth for persons and families of low or moderate income.

“Mortgage loan”
means an interest-bearing obligation secured by a mortgage.

“Multifamily residential housing”
means residential housing other than single-family residential housing, as hereinafter defined.

“Municipality”
means any city, town, county, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

“Nonhousing building”
means a building or portion thereof and any related improvements and facilities used or to be used for manufacturing, industrial, commercial, governmental, educational, entertainment, community development, health care, or nonprofit enterprises or undertakings other than residential housing.

“Persons and families of low and moderate income”
means persons and families, irrespective of race, creed, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity, determined by the HDA to require such assistance as is made available by this chapter on account of insufficient personal or family income taking into consideration, without limitation, such factors as follows: (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs, (ii) the size of the family, (iii) the cost and condition of housing facilities available, (iv) the ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal private housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing sanitary, decent and safe housing, and (v) if appropriate, standards established for various federal programs determining eligibility based on income of such persons and families.

“Real property”
means all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

“Residential housing”
means a specific work or improvement within the Commonwealth, whether multifamily residential housing or single-family residential housing undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations, including the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement of land, buildings and improvements thereto, for residential housing, and such other nonhousing facilities as may be incidental, related, or appurtenant thereto. For the purposes of this chapter, medical and related facilities for the residence and care of the aged shall be deemed to be dwelling accommodations.

“Single-family residential housing”
means residential housing consisting of four or fewer dwelling units, the person or family owning or intending to acquire such dwelling units, upon completion of the construction, rehabilitation, or improvement thereof, also occupying or intending to occupy one of such dwelling units.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1987, c. 363; 1988, c. 218; 1996, c. 498; 2004, c. 187; 2011, c. 690; 2020, c. 1137.

The 1996 amendment

added the paragraph defining “Economically mixed project.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 inserted the language “or housing development . . . mixed project” in the paragraph defining “Economically mixed project”; inserted the language “in the case of an economically mixed project . . . development of such area” in the paragraph defining “Housing development costs”; inserted “and, in the case of an economically mixed project, other persons and families” in the paragraph defining “Housing development”; substituted “Multifamily” for “Multi-family” in the paragraph defining “‘Multifamily”’; inserted the paragraph defining “Nonhousing building”; and substituted “multifamily” for “multi-family” in the paragraph defining “Residential housing.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 690 properly alphabetized the definition for “Federally insured mortgage”; added the definitions for “Housing lender” and “Loan servicer”; and in the definitions for “Land development” and “Residential housing,” substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, substituted “unless the context requires a different meaning” for “the following words and terms have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from” in the introductory language; substituted “sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity” for “or sex” in the introductory language for the definition for “Persons and families of low and moderate income”; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

§ 36-55.27.
Virginia Housing Development Authority continued; constituted a public instrumentality.

There is hereby continued within the Department of Housing and Community Development, for the purpose of §

36-55.51

, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Virginia with all of the politic and corporate powers as are set forth in this chapter, which are hereby reaffirmed, to be known as the “Virginia Housing Development Authority” to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The HDA is hereby constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the HDA of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1977, c. 613; 1979, c. 243.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 415, cl. 1 provides:

“§ 1. That the Virginia Housing Development Authority shall report to the Governor, the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology, and the Virginia Housing Commission no later than July 1, 2022, on recommendations, including any legislative recommendations, for the creation of a Virginia Good Neighbor Next Door Program to provide financial incentives for law-enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, and teachers to purchase homes within designated revitalization areas in the localities in which they are employed. Such program shall be similar to the Good Neighbor Next Door Program administered by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.”

§ 36-55.27:1.
Programs and regulations to implement the Consolidated Plan.

The HDA shall be responsible for implementing, to the extent and in the manner determined by the HDA to be reasonable and proper and consistent with its legal and financing responsibilities, new and existing programs, policies, and regulations to accomplish the goals, objectives, and strategies set forth in the Consolidated Plan developed in accordance with the provisions of §§

36-131

and

36-139

.

History.

1992, c. 754; 2002, c. 461.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 461 substituted “Consolidated Plan” for “Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy.”

Law Review.

For 1991 survey on property law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1991).

§ 36-55.28.
Appointment and tenure of commissioners; officers; quorum; compensation; liability.

The powers of HDA shall be vested in the commissioners of HDA as follows: a representative of the Board of Housing and Community Development, such representative to be selected by that Board; the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development as an ex officio voting commissioner; the Treasurer of the Commonwealth; and seven persons appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, for terms of four years. An additional commissioner satisfying the criteria specified by Section 2 (b) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, for a term of four years. If, however, after appointment, the additional commissioner no longer satisfies such criteria, he may be removed by the Governor effective upon the appointment and qualification of his successor, who shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. In appointing persons to the commission the Governor shall refrain from appointing more than three persons from any one commercial or industrial field. No commissioner appointed pursuant to this chapter by the Governor shall serve more than two consecutive full terms. Any vacancies in the membership of HDA shall be filled in like manner but only for the remainder of an unexpired term. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each commissioner shall hold office for the term of his appointment and until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified.

The commissioners shall elect from among their number a chairman and a vice-chairman annually and such other officers as they may determine. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever two commissioners so request. Five commissioners of the HDA shall constitute a quorum and any action taken by HDA under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution approved by a majority of the commissioners who are present at any regular or special meeting. No vacancy in the membership of the HDA shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the HDA.

Each commissioner shall be compensated from funds of the HDA at the rate per day specified in §

2.2-2813

for each day or portion thereof in which the commissioner is engaged in the business of the HDA. In addition, each commissioner shall be reimbursed for his reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out his duties under this chapter.

Commissioners and employees of HDA shall be subject to the standards of conduct set forth in the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.) and may be removed from office for inefficiency, neglect of duty or misconduct in the manner set forth therein.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of this Commonwealth shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his office or employment by reason of his acceptance of membership on HDA or his service thereto.

HDA may use its funds, and may obtain liability insurance or provide self-insurance, for the payment or reimbursement of costs and expenses (including, without limitation, amounts paid or to be paid in satisfaction of judgment or settlement, penalties, attorneys’ fees and expenses, and court costs) incident to any liability of its commissioners and employees arising from the performance or discharge of their official duties and such other activities as the commissioners of HDA may by resolution approve for the purpose of making such payment or reimbursement or providing such insurance or self-insurance.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1974, c. 668; 1975, c. 536; 1976, c. 117; 1977, c. 613; 1985, c. 70; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 226; 1992, c. 754; 1993, c. 857; 2002, c. 454; 2003, c. 434.

Editor’s note.

For United States Housing Act of 1937, as referred to above, see
42 USCS § 1437 et seq.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 454, in subsection A, substituted “the commissioners of HDA” for “ten commissioners” in the first sentence, inserted the second and third sentences, and inserted “Except as otherwise provided in this section” at the beginning of the final sentence; and inserted “who are” following “commissioners” in the third sentence of subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 434 substituted “voting” for “nonvoting” following “ex officio” in subsection A.

§ 36-55.29.
Executive director.

The commissioners shall employ an executive director who shall also be the secretary and who shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business of the HDA, subject to the policies, control and direction of the commissioners. The commissioners may employ technical experts and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The commissioners may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such administrative duties as it may deem proper.

The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of the HDA and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the HDA and of its minute book and seal. He shall have authority to cause to be made copies of all minutes and other records and documents of the HDA and to give certificates under the seal of the HDA to the effect that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the HDA may rely upon such certificates.

History.

1972, c. 830.